District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.03

Application to Indian tribes.

A child-custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, approved November 8, 1978 (92 Stat. 3069; 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq.), is not subject to this chapter to the extent that it is governed by the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 104 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).